sl-SI: Priprava brstičnega ohrovta: Predkuhano; Surovo; Pečeno; Začinjeno; Drugo
pt-PT: Preparação de couve de Bruxelas: Pré-cozinhado; Cru; Assado; Temperado; Outro
da: Tilberedning af rosenkål: Forkogt; Rå; Ristet; Krydret; Andet
pt-BR: Preparo da couve-de-bruxelas: Pré-cozido; Cru; Assado; Temperado; Outros
nl: Spruitjes bereiding: Voorgekookt; Rauw; Geroosterd; Gekruid; Overig
ro-RO: Preparare varză de Bruxelles: Pre-gătit; Crud; Prăjit; Condimentat; Altele
sv: Brysselkålsberedning: Förkokt; Rå; Rostad; Kryddad; Övrigt
pl: Sposób przygotowania brukselki: Wstępnie ugotowane; Surowe; Pieczone; Doprawione; Inne
ru: Способ подготовки брюссельской капусты: Предварительно приготовленная; Сырая; Запеченная; С приправами; Другое
nb: Tilberedning av rosenkål: Forhåndskokt; Rå; Ovnsbakt; Krydret; Annet
sk-SK: Príprava ružičkového kelu: Predvarené; Surové; Pečené; Ochutené; Iné
es: Preparación de las coles de Bruselas: Precocinadas; Crudas; Asadas; Condimentadas; Otra
en: Brussel sprout preparation: Precooked; Raw; Roasted; Seasoned; Other
th: รูปแบบการเตรียมกะหล่ำดาว: ปรุงสุก; ดิบ; อบ; ปรุงรส; อื่นๆ
ko: 방울양배추 손질 형태: 사전 조리; 생; 구움; 양념됨; 기타
el: Προετοιμασία για λαχανάκια Βρυξελλών: Προμαγειρεμένα; Ωμά; Ψητά; Καρυκευμένα; Άλλη
vi: Cách chuẩn bị cải Brussels: Nấu chín sẵn; Sống; Nướng; Ướp gia vị; Khác
lt-LT: Briuselinių kopūstų paruošimas: Apvirtas; Žalias; Keptas; Paskanintas prieskoniais; Kita
de: Rosenkohlzubereitung: Vorgekocht; Roh; Geröstet; Gewürzt; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Приготвяне на брюкселско зеле: Предварително сготвено; Сурово; Печено; Овкусено; Друго
hu: Kelbimbó előkészítése: Előfőzött; Nyers; Sült; Fűszerezett; Egyéb
hr-HR: Priprema prokulica: Prethodno kuhano; Sirovo; Pečeno; Začinjeno; Ostalo
tr: Brüksel lahanası hazırlama şekli: Önceden pişirilmiş; Çiğ; Fırınlanmış; Baharatlı; Diğer
ja: 芽キャベツの準備: 加熱調理済み; 生; ロースト; 味付け済み; その他
fr: Préparation des choux de Bruxelles: Précuit; Cru; Rôti; Assaisonné; Autre
zh-CN: 抱子甘蓝预处理方式: 预煮; 生; 烤制; 调味; 其他
it: preparazione dei cavoletti di Bruxelles: Precotto; Crudo; Arrostito; Condito; Altro
cs: Způsob přípravy růžičkové kapusty: Předvařené; Syrové; Pečené; Okořeněné; Jiné
fi: Ruusukaalien valmistus: Esikypsennetty; Raaka; Paahdettu; Maustettu; Muu
zh-TW: 抱子甘藍製備方式: 預煮; 生; 烘烤; 調味; 其他